Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Mississippi Civil War Battlefield Commission

§ 39-5-91.
Creation of Civil War Battlefield Commission; duties and responsibilities of commission.

There is hereby created a Mississippi Civil War Battlefield Commission consisting of the following fifteen (15) members:

Nine (9) members appointed by the Governor with three (3) serving for an initial term concluding on March 1, 1998, three (3) serving for an initial term concluding on March 1, 2000, and three (3) serving for an initial term concluding on March 1, 2002;

One (1) member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor for an initial term concluding on March 1, 2002;

One (1) member appointed by the Speaker of the Mississippi House of Representatives for an initial term concluding on March 1, 2002;

One (1) member appointed by the Jackson Civil War Roundtable for an initial term concluding on March 1, 2002; and

Three (3) members appointed by the Board of Trustees of the Department of Archives and History for an initial term concluding on March 1, 2002.

After the initial terms, all terms shall be for six (6) years. An appointment to fill a vacancy which arises for reasons other than by expiration of a term of office shall be made by the respective appointing authority for the unexpired term only.

The commission shall elect from its membership a chairman who shall preside over meetings and a vice chairman who shall preside in the absence of the chairman or when the chairman shall be excused.

The commission shall adopt rules and regulations governing times and places for meetings. A majority of members of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business. The commission shall meet at least quarterly. The commission may form subcommittees to address specific issues concerning preservation and enhancement of Civil War sites and structures. The commission may adopt other procedures necessary to ensure the orderly transaction of business.

The members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services.

Principal staff support for the commission shall be provided by the Department of Archives and History. Other agencies shall assist when requested by the commission.

The commission shall have the following duties:

Identify and prioritize for protecting Mississippi’s Civil War sites and structures;

Identify, analyze and enhance preservation opportunities for Mississippi’s Civil War sites and structures;

Review existing local, state and federal plans, programs and policies related to Mississippi’s Civil War sites and structures;

Develop relationships with federal and local officials and private conservation organizations which facilitate protection and enhancement of Civil War sites and structures;

Coordinate Mississippi’s participation with the federal government and private foundations to secure support and financial resources for the protection and enhancement of Civil War sites and structures;

Advise state agencies on matters relating to Civil War sites and structures; and

Perform any other such duties or actions in an effort to advance Civil War history in Mississippi.

The commission shall submit to the Governor an annual report by December 1 of each year which shall include recommendations for any legislative, administrative or other changes the commission deems necessary to further Civil War history in Mississippi.

State agencies shall consider the impact of their actions on Civil War sites and structures as identified by the commission whenever permitting, planning, funding or undertaking any construction projects.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 349, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1997.